Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.900

Early childhood education and assistance program—Short title—1985 c 418.

This act shall be known as the early childhood assistance act of 1985.

[ 1985 c 418 s 13. Formerly RCW 43.215.900, 28A.215.900, 28A.34A.904.]